Washington statutes.
RCW 44.39.045

Expenses and per diem.

The members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their expenses incurred while attending sessions of the committee or any subcommittee of the committee, or while engaged in other committee business authorized by the committee, as provided for in RCW 44.04.120.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 260 s 8.]